Washington statutes.
RCW 19.182.100

Consumer reporting agency—Consumer fees and charges for required information—Exceptions.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a consumer reporting agency may charge the following fees to the consumer:

(a) For making a disclosure under RCW 19.182.070 and 19.182.080, the consumer reporting agency may charge a fee not exceeding eight dollars. Beginning January 1, 1995, the eight-dollar charge may be adjusted on January 1st of each year based on corresponding changes in the consumer price index with fractional changes rounded to the nearest half dollar.

(b) For furnishing a notification, statement, or summary to a person under RCW 19.182.090(7), the consumer reporting agency may charge a fee not exceeding the charge that the agency would impose on each designated recipient for a consumer report. The amount of any charge must be disclosed to the consumer before furnishing the information.

(2) A consumer reporting agency shall make all disclosures under RCW 19.182.070 and 19.182.080 and furnish all consumer reports under RCW 19.182.090 without charge, if requested by the consumer within sixty days after receipt by the consumer of a notification of adverse action under RCW 19.182.110 or of a notification from a debt collection agency affiliated with that consumer reporting agency stating that the consumer's credit rating may be or has been adversely affected.

(3) A consumer reporting agency shall not impose any charge for (a) providing notice to a consumer required under RCW 19.182.090, or (b) notifying a person under RCW 19.182.090(7) of the deletion of information that is found to be inaccurate or that can no longer be verified, if the consumer designates that person to the agency before the end of the thirty-day period beginning on the date of notice under RCW 19.182.090(8).

[ 1993 c 476 s 12.]